New Jersey, session 221, S356.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a. As used in this section: County transit agency means a transportation service organized under or in conjunction with a county government, including, but not limited to, any such transportation service to provide trips to senior citizens and residents with disabilities under the Senior Citizen and Disabled Resident Transportation Assistance Act, P.L.1983, c.578 (C.27:25-25 et seq.). County transit service means motorbus regular route service and rail passenger service, including light rail service, operated by or under contract to a county transit agency. New Jersey Transit Corporation service or corporation service means motorbus regular route service and rail passenger service, including light rail service, operated by or under contract to the New Jersey Transit Corporation. One Stop Career Center means the same as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-3). b.    (1)  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the New Jersey Transit Corporation shall, upon application by an individual, offer a one-time transit pass, which shall provide up to three round-trips, free of charge, to any individual seeking to access a One Stop Career Center using corporation services. (2)   Within six months following the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the New Jersey Transit Corporation, in consultation with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, shall develop an application process for an individual seeking a one-time transit pass to access a One Stop Career Center. The application process shall, at a minimum, require an individual seeking to obtain a one-time transit pass, which shall provide up to three round-trips, free of charge, to demonstrate the individuals intention to access a One Stop Career Center. c.     Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, each county transit agency shall, upon application by an individual, offer a one-time transit pass, which shall provide up to three round-trips, free of charge, to any individual seeking to access a One Stop Career Center using county transit services. To the extent practicable, each county transit agency shall develop its application based on the application developed by the New Jersey Transit Corporation pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection b. of P.L.    , c.    (C.       ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.